Wisconsin, session 2025, AB950.
do enact as follows:AB950,11Section 1. 77.51 (13) (r) of the statutes is created to read:AB950,2,3277.51 (13) (r) A festival sponsor, as defined in s. 125.30 (6) (a) 2., who transfers 3alcohol beverages to attendees at a festival, as defined in s. 125.30 (6) (a) 1.AB950,21Section 2. 77.54 (7m) of the statutes is renumbered 77.54 (7m) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB950,3,16377.54 (7m) (intro.) Occasional sales of tangible personal property, or items or 4property under s. 77.52 (1) (b) or (c), or services, including admissions or tickets to 5an event; by a neighborhood association, church, civic group, garden club, social 6club or similar nonprofit organization; not involving entertainment for which 7payment in the aggregate exceeds $50,000 for performing or as reimbursement of 8expenses unless access to the event may be obtained without payment of a direct or 9indirect admission fee; conducted by the organization if the organization is not 10engaged in a trade or business and is not required to have a seller’s permit. For 11purposes of this subsection, an organization is engaged in a trade or business and is 12required to have a seller’s permit if its sales of tangible personal property, and 13items, property, and goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), and (d), and services, not 14including sales of tickets to events, and its events occur on more than 75 days 15during the year, unless its taxable receipts do not exceed $50,000 during the year. 16The exemption under this subsection does not apply to the any of the following:AB950,3,1817(a) The sales price from the sale of bingo supplies to players or to the sale, 18rental or use of regular bingo cards, extra regular cards and special bingo cards.AB950,319Section 3. 77.54 (7m) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB950,3,212077.54 (7m) (b) The sale of property, items, or services, including admissions 21or tickets, at a festival, as defined in s. 125.30 (6) (a) 1.AB950,422Section 4. 125.26 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB950,5,523125.26 (6) Temporary Class “B” licenses may be issued to bona fide clubs and 24chambers of commerce, to county or local fair associations or agricultural societies, 1to churches, lodges or societies that have been in existence for at least 6 months 2before the date of application, and to posts of veterans organizations authorizing the 3sale of fermented malt beverages at a particular picnic or similar gathering, at a 4meeting of the post, or during a fair conducted by the fair association or agricultural 5society. The amount of the fee for the license shall be determined by the municipal 6governing body issuing the license but may not exceed $10. An official or body 7authorized by a municipal governing body to issue temporary Class “B” licenses 8may, upon issuance of any temporary Class “B” license, authorize the licensee to 9permit underage persons to be on the premises for which the license is issued. A 10license issued to a county or district fair licenses the entire fairgrounds where the 11fair is being conducted and all persons engaging in retail sales of fermented malt 12beverages from leased stands on the fairgrounds. The county or district fair to 13which the license is issued may lease stands on the fairgrounds to persons who may 14engage in retail sales of fermented malt beverages from the stands while the fair is 15being held. A municipal governing body may issue a temporary Class “B” license for 16premises that are covered by a “Class B” permit issued under s. 125.51 (5) (b) 2. if 17the applicant meets the requirements of this subsection. If a license is issued under 18this subsection to a fair association solely for the purpose of conducting on the 19licensed premises fermented malt beverages judging or tasting events involving 20servings of fermented malt beverages no greater than one fluid ounce each, s. 21125.32 (2) does not apply to these licensed premises. If a license is issued under this 22subsection to a festival sponsor, as defined in s. 125.30 (6) (a) 2., for the purpose of 23operating a festival, as defined in s. 125.30 (6) (a) 1., on the licensed premises, the 24festival sponsor shall, at least 15 days before the festival, provide notice to the 1division, in the form and manner prescribed by the division, of the date and location 2of the festival and identifying all brewers and brewpubs participating in the 3festival. A festival sponsor may not purchase or possess fermented malt beverages 4to be provided under s. 125.30 (6) (b) unless the festival sponsor satisfies this notice 5requirement.AB950,56Section 5. 125.30 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB950,5,187125.30 (1) The division shall issue out-of-state shippers’ permits which, 8except as provided in sub. (4), authorize the permittee to ship fermented malt 9beverages only to holders of a wholesaler’s permit issued under s. 125.28. Except 10with respect to any shipment from a warehouse in an adjoining state by a 11wholesaler issued a wholesale permit under s. 125.28 (1) (b) and except as provided 12in sub. (6), no person may receive fermented malt beverages in this state which have 13been directly shipped from outside this state by any person other than the holder of 14a permit issued under this section. Subject to s. 125.34 (2), all shipments of 15fermented malt beverages to a wholesaler of fermented malt beverages in this state, 16whether shipped to the wholesaler from inside this state or from outside this state, 17shall be unloaded in, physically at rest in, and only then distributed from the 18wholesaler’s warehouse in this state.AB950,619Section 6. 125.30 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB950,5,2020125.30 (6) (a) In this subsection:AB950,5,22211. “Festival” means an event occurring on consecutive days to which all of the 22following apply:AB950,5,2423a. An admission fee is charged to attend the event and no additional 24consideration is received for service of fermented malt beverages at the event.AB950,6,11b. The duration of the event does not exceed 2 consecutive days.AB950,6,32c. Fermented malt beverages manufactured by at least 25 different brewers or 3brewpubs are offered at the event.AB950,6,64d. Service of fermented malt beverages at the event complies with s. 125.33 (2) 5(p) 1., except that a brewer or brewpub may have up to 6 individuals representing 6the brewer or brewpub at the event.AB950,6,872. “Festival sponsor” means a person who holds a temporary Class “B” license 8under s. 125.26 (6) and operates a festival on the licensed premises.AB950,6,129(b) An out-of-state brewer that does not hold a permit issued under this 10section may sell and ship, transport, or deliver fermented malt beverages directly to 11a festival sponsor for consumption at a festival. No out-of-state brewer may ship 12more than 5 barrels of fermented malt beverages for each festival.AB950,713Section 7. 125.33 (9) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB950,6,1814125.33 (9) (a) Except as provided in ss. 125.26 (6), 125.29 (3m) (b) and (c), 15125.295 (1) (g), and 125.30 (4) and (6), no campus or retail licensee or permittee may 16purchase or possess fermented malt beverages purchased from any person other 17than a wholesaler holding a permit under this chapter for the sale of fermented 18malt beverages.AB950,819Section 8. 125.34 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB950,7,720125.34 (2) Except as provided in ss. 125.29 (3m) (b) and (c), 125.295 (1) (e) and 21(g), and 125.30 (4) and (6), no fermented malt beverages may be sold, transported, 22or delivered to a retailer unless, prior to such sale, transport, or delivery, the 23fermented malt beverages are first unloaded at, physically at rest at, and only then 24distributed from a wholesaler’s warehouse premises covered by both a wholesaler’s 1permit issued under s. 125.28 and an alcohol beverage warehouse permit issued 2under s. 125.19, which premises shall be in this state. This subsection does not 3apply to a wholesaler issued a wholesaler’s permit under s. 125.28 (1) (b) with 4respect to fermented malt beverages transported and delivered from a warehouse in 5an adjoining state unless the wholesaler’s warehouse in the adjoining state is 6located on premises in the adjoining state used for the manufacture of fermented 7malt beverages.AB950,98Section 9. 125.34 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB950,7,159125.34 (5) Except as provided in ss. 125.29 (3m) (b) and (c), 125.295 (1) (e) and 10(g), and 125.30 (4) and (6), deliveries of fermented malt beverages to retailers may 11be made only by wholesalers and shall be made to retailers only at their retail 12premises. No retailer may transport fermented malt beverages from one retail 13premises to another retail premises for purposes of selling the fermented malt 14beverages at the other retail premises unless both retail premises are operated by a 15brewpub holding the retail licenses.AB950,1016Section 10. 125.34 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB950,7,1917125.34 (6) Except as provided in ss. 125.29 (3), (3m) (b) and (c), and (7) and 18125.30 (4) and (6), a brewer or out-of-state shipper may sell, transport, and deliver 19fermented malt beverages only to a wholesaler.AB950,1120Section 11. 139.04 (10) of the statutes is created to read:AB950,7,2321139.04 (10) Sale, possession, or removal of fermented malt beverages for 22shipment, transport, or delivery to a festival sponsor, as defined in s. 125.30 (6) (a) 232., for consumption at a festival, as defined in s. 125.30 (6) (a) 1.AB950,1224Section 12. 139.05 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB950,8,31139.05 (8) No return is required under this section by a brewer operating 2under s. 125.30 (6) (b) whose entire sales or distribution of fermented malt 3beverages into this state qualifies for the exemption under s. 139.04 (10).AB950,134Section 13. Effective date.AB950,8,65(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 6publication.AB950,8,77